District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Long Bridge Project Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 104a(b) of the Urban Forest Preservation Act of 2002, effective July 1,
2016 (D.C. Law 21-133; D.C. Official Code § 8-651.04a(b)), is amended by adding a new
paragraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3) The Mayor shall issue a Heritage Tree removal permit under this section for a
Heritage Tree that abuts or is within the site of the Long Bridge Project managed by the Virginia
Passenger Rail Authority if:
“(A) There is no reasonable design alternative that can avoid the location
of the Heritage Tree;
“(B) The Urban Forestry Division has determined that the tree cannot
reasonably be protected in place;
“(C) The applicant has demonstrated that:
“(i) The cost of relocation exceeds $1 million; or
“(ii) Relocation would cause an undue burden to the public; and
“(D) The applicant has agreed to pay $1,200 per each inch of the
circumference of the Heritage Tree in question.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2